North Carolina, session 2025, HB688.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 143B-135.56 reads as rewritten:
"§ 143B-135.56. Parks and Recreation Trust Fund.
(a) Fund Created. – There is established a Parks and Recreation Trust Fund in the State
Treasurer's Office. The Trust Fund shall be a special revenue fund consisting of donations, gifts,
and devises to the Trust Fund and other monies appropriated to the Trust Fund by the General
Assembly.
(b) Use. – Funds in the Trust Fund are annually appropriated to the North Carolina Parks
and Recreation Authority and, unless otherwise specified by the General Assembly or the terms
or conditions of a gift or grant, shall be allocated and used as follows:
(1) Sixty-five percent (65%) for the State Parks System or a State recreational
forest for capital projects, repairs and renovations of park facilities, and land
acquisition.
(2) Thirty percent (30%) to provide matching funds to local governmental units
or public authorities as defined in G.S. 159-7 on a dollar-for-dollar basis for
local park and recreation purposes. The appraised value of land that is donated
to a local government unit or public authority may be applied to the matching
requirement of this subdivision. These funds shall be allocated by the North
Carolina Parks and Recreation Authority based on criteria patterned after the
Open Project Selection Process established for the Land and Water
Conservation Fund administered by the National Park Service of the United
States Department of the Interior. Funds appropriated for inclusive parks
facilities under subsection (h) of this section shall be awarded separately and
not be counted toward the percentage cap set forth in this subdivision.
(3) Five percent (5%) for the Coastal and Estuarine Water Beach Access Program.
(c) Geographic Distribution. – In allocating funds in the Trust Fund under this section,
the North Carolina Parks and Recreation Authority shall make geographic distribution across the
State to the extent practicable.
(d) Administrative Expenses. – Of the funds appropriated to the North Carolina Parks
and Recreation Authority from the Trust Fund each year, no more than three percent (3%) may
be used by the Department for operating expenses associated with managing capital
improvements projects, acquiring land, and administration of local grants programs.
*H688-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(e) Operating Expenses for State Parks System Allocations. – In allocating funds in the
Trust Fund under subdivision (1) of subsection (b) of this section, the North Carolina Parks and
Recreation Authority shall consider the operating expenses associated with each capital project,
repair and renovation project, and each land acquisition. In considering the operating expenses,
the North Carolina Parks and Recreation Authority shall determine both:
(1) The minimal anticipated operating expenses, which are determined by the
minimum staff and other operating expenses needed to maintain the project.
(2) The optimal anticipated operating budget, which is determined by the level of
staff and other operating expenses required to achieve a more satisfactory
level of operation under the project.
(f) Reports. – The North Carolina Parks and Recreation Authority shall report no later
than October 1 of each year to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Agriculture and
Natural and Economic Resources, the Fiscal Research Division, and the Environmental Review
Commission on allocations from the Trust Fund from the prior fiscal year. For funds allocated
from the Trust Fund under subsection (c) of this section, this report shall include the operating
expenses determined under subdivisions (1) and (2) of subsection (e) of this section.
(g) Debt. – The Authority may allocate up to fifty percent (50%) of the portion of the
annual appropriation identified in subdivision (b)(1) of this section to reimburse the General Fund
for debt service on special indebtedness to be issued or incurred under Article 9 of Chapter 142
of the General Statutes for the purposes provided in subdivision (b)(1) of this section and for
waterfront access. In order to allocate funds for debt service reimbursement, the Authority must
identify to the State Treasurer the specific parks projects for which it would like special
indebtedness to be issued or incurred and the annual amount it intends to make available, and
request the State Treasurer to issue or incur the indebtedness. After special indebtedness has been
issued or incurred for a parks project requested by the Authority, the Authority must credit to the
General Fund each year the actual aggregate principal and interest payments to be made in that
year on the special indebtedness, as identified by the State Treasurer.
(h) Continuing Appropriation for Inclusive Playgrounds. – The General Assembly finds
that there is a critical need in this State for construction of special parks facilities or adaptation
of existing parks facilities for persons with disabilities, and therefore it is essential that the State
provide continuing dedicated funding to the Trust Fund for this purpose. Therefore, there is
appropriated from the General Fund to the Trust Fund in each fiscal year the sum of one hundred
thousand dollars ($100,000) to be used for grants to local governmental units, public school units,
or public authorities, as defined in G.S. 159-7, for construction of special facilities or adaptation
of existing facilities that meet the unique needs of persons with disabilities or that enable them
to participate in recreational and sporting activities, regardless of their abilities. Grants made
under this subsection shall not exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000), and the local governmental
unit, public school unit, or public authority receiving a grant under this subsection shall provide
matching funds in the amount of one dollar ($1.00) of local funds for every five dollars ($5.00)
of State funds."
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
Page 2 House Bill 688-First Edition